Connecticut, session 2026, HB05063.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to reduce to two
per cent the sales and use taxes rate applicable to the sale of and the
storage, use or other consumption in the state of construction or
building materials for the construction or rehabilitation of housing.